Georgia, session 2025_26, HB211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "PFAS Receiver Shield Act."
SECTION 2.
Title 51 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to torts, is amended by adding
a new chapter to read as follows:
"CHAPTER 17
51-17-1.
As used in this chapter, the term:
H. B. 211
- 1 -

LC 44 2971ER
(1) 'PFAS' means any perfluorochemicals, polyfluorochemicals, perfluoroalkyl
substances, polyfluoroalkyl substances, and any related chemicals that degrade to
PFAS/PFOA/PFOS, and any precursors to PFAS, PFOA, and PFOS, including, but not
limited to, PFOA, PFOS, GenX, HFPODA, NEtFOSAA, NMeFOSAA, PFBS, PFDA,
PFDoA, PFHpA, PFHxS, PFNA, PFTrDA, PFTA, PFUnA, 11Cl0PF3OUdS,
9Cl-PF3ONS, ADONA, PFPeS, PFHpS, 4:2 FTS (1H, 1H, 2H, 2H-perfluorohexane
sulfonic acid), 6:2 FTS (1H, 1H, 2H, 2H-perfluorohexane sulfonic acid), 8:2 FTS (1H,
1H, 2H, 2H-perfluorohexane sulfonic acid), PFBA, PFPeA, PFMBA, PFMPA, PFEESA,
and NFDHA.
(2) 'PFAS manufacturer' means any person or entity that knowingly created, formulated,
licensed, made, manufactured, or otherwise originated into commerce any PFAS
substance and who has sold or licensed any PFAS substance to others for use.
(3) 'PFAS monomer' means the class of fluorinated substances that are components of
PFAS substances, including PFOA, PFOS, GenX, HFPODA, NEtFOSAA, NMeFOSAA,
PFBS, PFDA, PFDoA, PFHpA, PFHxS, PFNA, PFTrDA, PFTA, PFUnA,
11Cl0PF3OUdS, 9Cl-PF3ONS, ADONA, PFPeS, PFHpS, 4:2 FTS (1H, 1H, 2H,
2H-perfluorohexane sulfonic acid), 6:2 FTS (1H, 1H, 2H, 2H-perfluorohexane sulfonic
acid), 8:2 FTS (1H, 1H, 2H, 2H-perfluorohexane sulfonic acid), PFBA, PFPeA, PFMBA,
PFMPA, PFEESA, NFDHA, and chemically similar molecules.
(4) 'PFAS receiver' means any person or entity, not including any person or entity that
is also a PFAS manufacturer, who:
(A) Uses or applies PFAS substances in the manufacture of goods or in agriculture;
(B) Receives or obtains goods or products that contain PFAS;
(C) Purchases or owns goods or products that contain PFAS; and
(D) Receives industrial or household waste that contains PFAS.
(5) 'PFAS substance' means any chemical agent or compound containing PFAS, any
polymer where a PFAS monomer is a constituent in the polymerization process, or any
H. B. 211
- 2 -

LC 44 2971ER
combination of materials where a PFAS monomer is found as a portion of another
molecule received by others for application or use in agriculture or in manufactured
goods or as a processing aid in any industry other than the chemical manufacturing
industry.
51-17-2.
(a) No PFAS receiver shall be held liable for damages in an action involving a liability
claim arising from or related to their intended or incidental use, receipt, or disposal of
PFAS.
(b) The immunity set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be provided in
addition to, and shall in no way limit, any other immunity protections that may apply in
state or federal law.
(c) The immunity set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to claims
brought by the Georgia Environmental Protection Division enforcing PFAS-specific
regulations arising on or after January 1, 2024.
51-17-3.
This chapter shall not modify or supersede the terms or application of:
(1) Title 16, relating to crimes and offenses;
(2) Title 31, relating to health or any state regulations related thereto;
(3) Chapter 9 of Title 34, relating to workers' compensation; or
(4) Chapter 3 of Title 38, relating to emergency management."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 211
- 3 -

LC 44 2971ER
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 211
- 4 -